Florida, session 2026, HB1503.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (g) of subsection (3) of section
1003.4282, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.4282 Requirements for a standard high school
diploma.—
(3) STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; COURSE AND ASSESSMENT
REQUIREMENTS.—
(g) Credits in electives.—School districts shall must
develop and offer coordinated electives so that a student may
develop knowledge and skills in his or her area of interest,
such as electives with a STEM focus, including courses in
computer technology, such as artificial intelligence, or a
liberal arts focus. Such electives must include opportunities
for students to earn college credit, including industry-
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1503 2026
certified career education programs or series of career-themed
courses that result in industry certification or articulate into
the award of college credit, or career education courses for
which there is a statewide or local articulation agreement and
which lead to college credit. A student entering grade 9 before
the 2023-2024 school year must earn eight credits in electives.
A student entering grade 9 in the 2023-2024 school year or
thereafter must earn seven and one-half credits in electives.
Section 2. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
1007.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1007.25 General education courses; common prerequisites;
other degree requirements.—
(3) The chair of the State Board of Education and the
chair of the Board of Governors, or their designees, shall
jointly appoint faculty committees to review and recommend to
the Articulation Coordinating Committee for approval by the
State Board of Education and the Board of Governors statewide
general education core course options for inclusion in the
statewide course numbering system established under s. 1007.24.
Faculty committees shall, by July 1, 2024, and by July 1 every 4
years thereafter, review and submit recommendations to the
Articulation Coordinating Committee and the commissioner for the
removal, alignment, realignment, or addition of general
education core courses that satisfy the requirements of this
subsection.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1503 2026
(d) General education core courses must meet the following
standards:
1. Communication courses must afford students the ability
to communicate effectively, including the ability to write
clearly and engage in public speaking.
2. Humanities courses must afford students the ability to
think critically through the mastering of subjects concerned
with human culture, especially literature, history, art, music,
and philosophy, and must include selections from the Western
canon.
3. Social science courses must afford students an
understanding of the basic social and behavioral science
concepts and principles used in the analysis of behavior and
past and present social, political, and economic issues.
4. Natural science courses must afford students the
ability to critically examine and evaluate the principles of the
scientific method, model construction, and use the scientific
method to explain natural experiences and phenomena.
5. Mathematics courses must afford students a mastery of
foundational mathematical and computation models and methods by
applying such models and methods in problem solving.
6. Technology courses must afford students an
understanding of computer science, through artificial
intelligence applications and the mastering of subjects
concerned with software engineering, computer networks, database
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1503 2026
systems, and cyber security.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1503-00